District of Columbia statutes.
16-3102

Settlement of accounts as prima facie evidence only.

Except as provided by section 16-3111 , in actions:

(1)

for an accounting, by legatees or next to kin against personal representatives, or wards against their guardians; or

(2)

to subject the real estate of decedents to the payment of their debts, by creditors against personal representatives, or against heirs or devisees —

a prior settlement of accounts in the Probate Court is only prima facie evidence as to the correctness of the accounts.

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 598, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1
Sept. 6, 1980, D.C. Law 3-85, § 5(a), 27 DCR 2900
Apr. 30, 1988, D.C. Law 7-104, § 4(t), 35 DCR 147
1981 Ed., § 16-3102.
1973 Ed., § 16-3102.